Idaho statutes. Title 22 AGRICULTURE AND HORTICULTURE
Chapter 21
PLANT PEST CONTROL AND RESEARCH COMMISSION

Sec.

§ 22-2101 — 22-2108. Commission created — Membership — Powers of commission — “Pest” defined — Employment of assistants — Utilization of state agencies — Trustee for funds — Office and meetings — Expenditure of funds — Compensation and expenses — Agency for discharge of delegated duties — Deficiency warrants for pest control. [Repealed.]